en: Cherry nectars
bg: Нектар от череши
de: Kirschnektare
fr: Nectars de cerise
hr: Nektari trešnje
hu: Cseresznyenektárok
it: Nettare di ciliegia
lt: Vyšnių nektarai, vyšnių nektaras
pl: Nektary wiśniowe
pt: Néctares de cereja

en: Pineapple nectars
bg: Нектар от ананас
de: Annanasnektare
es: Néctares de piña, néctar de piña
fr: Nectars d'ananas
he: נקטרי אננס, נקטר אננס, מיצי אננס, מיץ אננס
hr: Nektari od ananasa
hu: Ananásznektárok
it: Nettari di ananas, nettare di ananas
lt: Ananasų nektarai, ananasų nektaras
nl: Ananasnectars, Ananasnectar
pl: Nektary ananasowe
pt: Néctares de ananás, néctares de abacaxi

en: Kiwifruit nectars, Kiwi nectars
bg: Нектар от киви
de: Kiwinektar
fr: Nectars de kiwi
hr: Nektari kivija
hu: Kivinektárok
it: Nettari di kiwi, nettare di kiwi
pl: Nektary z kiwi

en: Pomegranate nectars
de: Granatapfelnektare
es: Néctares de granada
fr: Nectars de grenade
hr: Nektari nara
hu: Gránátalmanektárok
it: Nettari di melograno, nettare di melograno, nettari di melagrana, nettare di melagrana
lt: Granatų vaisių nektarai, granatų vaisių nektaras
nl: Granaatappelnectars, Granaatappelnectar
pl: Nektary z granatu
pt: Néctares de romã

en: Tangerine nectars
de: Mandarinennektare
es: Néctares de mandarina, Néctares de clementina
fr: Nectars de mandarine, nectars de clémentine
hr: Nektari mandarina
hu: Mandarinnektárok
it: Nettari di mandarino, nettare di mandarino
lt: Mandarinų nektarai, mandarinų nektaras
nl: Mandarijnennectars, Mandarijnennectar

en: Vegetable-based beverages
bg: Напитки от зеленчуци
de: Gemüse basierte Getränke
es: Bebidas a base de verduras y hortalizas
fi: kasvispohjaiset juomat
fr: Boissons aux légumes, boissons à base de légumes
he: משקאות צמחים, משקה צמחים
hr: Pića na bazi povrća
hu: Zöldségalapú italok
it: Bevande a base di verdure
lt: Daržovių gėrimai
nl: Groentedranken, Groentedrank, Groentendrank
pl: Napoje na bazie warzyw

en: Vegetable juices
bg: Зеленчукови сокове
da: Grøntsagsjuicer
de: Gemüsesäfte
es: Zumos de verduras y hortalizas
fi: kasvismehut
fr: Jus de légumes, Jus de légumes pur jus
he: מיצי ירקות
hr: Sokovi od povrća
hu: Növényi levek, Növényi dzsúszok
it: Succhi di verdura, succo di verdura
ja: 野菜ジュース
lt: Daržovių sultys
nl: Groentesappen, Groentesap, Groentensap
pl: Sok warzywny, Soki warzywne
sv: Grönsaksjuicer
tr: Sebze suyu
zh: 蔬菜汁

en: Frozen vegetable juices
da: Frosne grøntsagsjuicer
sv: Frysta grönsaksjuicer

en: Carrot juices
bg: Сок от моркови
da: Gulerodsjuicer
de: Karottensäfte
es: Zumos de zanahoria
fi: porkkanamehut
fr: Jus de carotte, jus de carottes
he: מיצי גזר, מיצי גזרים, מיץ גזר
hr: Sokovi od mrkve
hu: Répalevek, Répalé
it: Succo di carota
ja: にんじんジュース
lt: Morkų sultys
nl: Wortelsappen, Wortelsap
pl: Soki marchewkowe
ru: Морковные соки
sv: Morotsjuicer
tr: Havuç suyu
zh: 胡萝卜汁

en: Concentrated carrot juices
de: Karottensäfte aus Kartottenkonzentrat
es: Zumos de zanahoria procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de carotte à base de concentré, jus de carottes à base de concentré
hr: Koncentrirani sokovi od mrkve
hu: Répalésűrítmények
it: Succo di carota da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos morkų sultys
nl: Wortelsappen uit concentraat, Wortelsap uit concentraat

en: Pure carrot juices, Pure carrot juice
da: Rene gulerodsjuicer
fr: Jus de carotte pur jus
sv: Rena morotsjuicer

en: Beetroot juices
bg: Сок от червено цвекло
fr: Jus de betterave
hr: Sokovi od cikle
hu: Céklalevek, Céklalé
it: Succo di barbabietola
ja: ビートルートジュース, ビーツジュース
lt: Burokėlių sultys
nl: Rode bietensappen, Rode bietensap

en: Tomato juices
bg: Сок от домати
de: Tomatensaft, Tomatensäfte
es: Zumos de tomate
fi: tomaattimehut
fr: Jus de tomates, jus de tomate
hr: Sokovi od rajčice
hu: Paradicsomlevek, Paradicsomlé
it: Succo di pomodoro
ja: トマトジュース
lt: Pomidorų sultys
nl: Tomatensappen, Tomatensap
pl: Soki pomidorowe, sok pomidorowy
ro: Suc de roșii
ru: Томатный сок, Томатные соки
zh: 番茄汁

en: Concentrated tomato juices
bg: Доматен сок от концентрат
de: Tomatensaft aus Tomatensaftkonzentrat
es: Zumos de tomate procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de tomates à base de concentré, jus de tomate à base de concentré
hr: Koncentriranih sokova od rajčice
hu: Paradicsomlé-sűrítmény, Sűrített paradicsomlé
lt: Koncentruotos pomidorų sultys, pomidorų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Tomatensappen uit concentraat, Tomatensap uit concentraat

en: Pure tomato juices
bg: Чисти доматени сокове
de: Reiner Tomatensaft
es: Zumos de tomate puro
fi: puhdas tomaattimehu
fr: Jus de tomate pur jus
hr: Čisti sokovi od rajčice
it: Succo di pomodoro puro
ja: 純粋なトマトジュース
lt: Grynos pomidorų sultys
nl: Puur tomatensap
pl: Czyste soki pomidorowe
ru: Чистые томатные соки
tr: Katkısız domates suyu
zh: 纯番茄汁

en: Pure tomato juice with 3 g salt/L, Pure tomato juice with 3 grams of salt per liter
fr: Jus de tomate pur jus salé à 3 g/L, Jus de tomate pur jus salé à 3 grammes de sel par litre

en: Pure tomato juice with 6 g salt/L, Pure tomato juice with 6 grams of salt per liter
fr: Jus de tomate pur jus salé à 6 g/L, Jus de tomate pur jus salé à 6 grammes de sel par litre

en: Hot beverages, hot drinks
bg: Топли напитки
ca: Begudes calentes
da: Varme drikke
de: Heißgetränke
es: Bebidas para tomar calientes
fi: kuumat juomat
fr: Boissons chaudes
he: משקאות חמים
hr: Topli napitci
hu: Forró italok, Meleg italok
it: Bevande calde
lt: Karšti gėrimai, Karštieji gėrimai
nl: Warme dranken, Warme drank
pl: Napoje gorące, ciepłe napoje
pt: Bebidas quentes
ro: Băuturi calde
ru: Горячие напитки
th: เครื่องดื่มร้อน
tr: Sıcak içecekler
zh: 热饮料

en: Herbal teas, Herbal infusions, infusions
bg: Билков чай
ca: Infusions, infusions herbals
cs: Bylinné čaje
da: Urteteer, Urtete, Urtethe
de: Kräutertees
es: Plantas para infusiones, Infusiones, Tisanas
fi: yrttiteet
fr: Infusions, Tisanes, Infusion
he: תה צמחי
hr: Biljni čajevi
hu: Gyógynövényes teák
it: Tisane, Infusi
ja: ハーブティ, ハーブティー
lt: Žolelių arbatos, Žolelių užpilai, užpilai
nl: Kruidentheeën, Kruidenthee
pl: Herbaty ziołowe
pt: Chás de ervas, infusões de ervas, infusões
ru: Травяные чаи и настойки
sv: Örtteer, Örtte
zh: 花草茶

en: Herbal teas in tea bags, Herbal teas in bags
da: Urteteer i pose, Urtete i poser
de: Kräutertee aus Teebeuteln
es: Plantas para infusiones en bolsitas, Infusiones en bolsitas, Tisanas en bolsitas
fi: Yrttipussiteet
fr: Infusions en sachets
hr: Biljni čajevi u vrećicama
hu: Filteres gyógynövényes teák, Gyógynövényes teák tasakban, Gyógynövényes teák filterben
it: Tisane in bustina, Infusi in bustina
lt: Žolelių arbatos maišeliuose
nl: Kruidenthee in zakjes, Kruidenthee in buidels
pl: Herbatki ziołowe w torebkach, Herbaty ziołowe w torebkach
ru: Чай в пакетиках
sv: Örtteer i pås, Örtte i pås